New York, session 2025-2026, S634.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subsection (i) of section 3216 of the insurance law is 2 amended by adding a new paragraph 15-b to read as follows: 3 (15-b) (A) Every policy which provides medical coverage that includes 4 coverage for physician services in a physician's office and every policy 5 which provides major medical or similar comprehensive-type coverage 6 shall include coverage for screening for diabetes and prediabetes pursu- 7 ant to a national evidence-based practice guideline. 8 (B) A policy subject to this paragraph shall not impose a deductible, 9 co-insurance, co-payment, or any other cost-sharing requirement on such 10 coverage provided pursuant to this paragraph. 11 § 2. Subsection (k) of section 3221 of the insurance law is amended by 12 adding a new paragraph 7-a to read as follows: 13 (7-a) (A) Every group or blanket accident and health insurance policy 14 issued or issued for delivery in this state which provides medical 15 coverage that includes coverage for physician services in a physician's 16 office and every policy which provides major medical or similar compre- 17 hensive-type coverage shall include coverage for screening for diabetes 18 and prediabetes pursuant to a national evidence-based practice guide- 19 line. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01888-04-5 S. 634--B 2 1 (B) A group or blanket policy subject to this paragraph shall not 2 impose a deductible, co-insurance, co-payment, or any other cost-sharing 3 requirement on such coverage provided pursuant to this paragraph. 4 § 3. Subsection (u-1) of section 4303 of the insurance law is renum- 5 bered subsection (u-2) and a new subsection (u-1) is added to read as 6 follows: 7 (u-1) (1) A medical expense indemnity corporation or a health service 8 corporation which provides medical coverage that includes coverage for 9 physician services in a physician's office and every policy which 10 provides major medical or similar comprehensive-type coverage shall 11 include coverage for screening for diabetes and prediabetes pursuant to 12 a national evidence-based practice guideline. 13 (2) A contract subject to this subsection shall not impose a deduct- 14 ible, co-insurance, co-payment, or any other cost-sharing requirement on 15 such coverage provided pursuant to this subsection. 16 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to poli- 17 cies and contracts issued, renewed, modified, altered or amended on or 18 after such effective date.